Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2708.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6745YH (4) 91 as/js H.F. 2708 Section 1. Section 707.6A, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. A person commits an aggravated 3 misdemeanor when the person unintentionally injures another 4 person by operating a motor vehicle while intoxicated, as 5 prohibited by section 321J.2. A person committing a second or 6 subsequent violation of this subsection commits a class âDâ 7 felony. 8